New Jersey, session 221, S4042.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Commissioner of Health shall establish a program in the Department of Health with the purpose of purchasing and distributing xylazine test strips to entities providing authorized harm reduction services in the State pursuant to P.L.2006, c.99 (C.26:5C-25 et al.). b.  In implementing the program, the department shall: (1)   oversee the bulk purchasing and the distribution of xylazine test strips to entities that provide authorized harm reduction services, upon request by the entity; and (2) establish and maintain an Internet website that provides information to the public concerning xylazine test strips and the availability of xylazine test strips through entities providing authorized harm reduction services in the State. c.  The program established pursuant to this section shall be supported by such federal funds as may be available for this purpose, as well as by any funds appropriated to the department to implement the purposes of this act. 2.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health such sums as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.